Florida, session 2026, SB298.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 741.465, Florida Statutes, is amended to 19 read: 20 741.465âPublic records exemption for the Address 21 Confidentiality Program for Victims of Domestic and Dating 22 Violence.â 23 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âaddressâ means 24 a residential street address, school address, or work address, 25 as specified on the individualâs application to be a program 26 participant in the Address Confidentiality Program for Victims 27 of Domestic and Dating Violence. 28 (2)(1)âThe addresses, corresponding telephone numbers, and 29 social security numbers of program participants in the Address 30 Confidentiality Program for Victims of Domestic and Dating 31 Violence held by the Office of the Attorney General are exempt 32 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 33 Constitution, except the information may be disclosed under the 34 following circumstances: to a law enforcement agency for 35 purposes of assisting in the execution of a valid arrest 36 warrant; if directed by a court order, to a person identified in 37 the order; or if the certification has been canceled. For 38 purposes of this section, the term âaddressâ means a residential 39 street address, school address, or work address, as specified on 40 the individualâs application to be a program participant in the 41 Address Confidentiality Program for Victims of Domestic 42 Violence. 43 (3)(2)âThe names, addresses, and telephone numbers of 44 participants in the Address Confidentiality Program for Victims 45 of Domestic and Dating Violence contained in voter registration 46 and voting records held by the supervisor of elections and the 47 Department of State are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 48 Art. I of the State Constitution, except the information may be 49 disclosed under the following circumstances: to a law 50 enforcement agency for purposes of assisting in the execution of 51 an arrest warrant or, if directed by a court order, to a person 52 identified in the order. This exemption applies to information 53 made exempt by this subsection before, on, or after the 54 effective date of the exemption. 55 (4)(a)âSubsections (2) and (3) apply to records held by the 56 Office of the Attorney General, the Department of State, and 57 each supervisor of elections before, on, or after the effective 58 date of the exemptions. 59 (b)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 60 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 61 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 62 through reenactment by the Legislature. 63 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 64 necessity that the addresses, corresponding telephone numbers, 65 and social security numbers of victims of dating violence who 66 participate in the Address Confidentiality Program for Victims 67 of Domestic and Dating Violence held by the Office of the 68 Attorney General be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 69 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The 70 Legislature recognizes that greater protection is needed for 71 victims of dating violence, similar to that currently afforded 72 to victims of domestic violence, to prevent harm from assailants 73 or probable assailants who are attempting to find them. The 74 Legislature finds that release of such information could 75 significantly threaten the physical safety and security of 76 victims of dating violence who participate in the program and 77 that the harm that may result from the release of the 78 information outweighs any public benefit that might result from 79 public disclosure of the information. 80 (2)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity 81 that the names, addresses, and telephone numbers contained in 82 voter registration and voting records of victims of dating 83 violence who participate in the Address Confidentiality Program 84 for Victims of Domestic and Dating Violence held by the 85 supervisor of elections and the Department of State be made 86 exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 87 Article I of the State Constitution. Victims of dating violence 88 who are participants in the program will have demonstrated to 89 the Office of the Attorney General that there exists a risk to 90 their physical safety and security. Nonetheless, these program 91 participants must be afforded the ability to participate in 92 society and cast a vote in elections. However, the supervisor of 93 elections must have a verifiable address for a program 94 participant in order to place the participant in the proper 95 voting district and to maintain accurate records for compliance 96 with state and federal requirements. The public record exemption 97 for the name of a victim of dating violence who is a participant 98 in the program is a public necessity because access to such name 99 narrows the location of that participant to his or her voting 100 area. In addition, access to such participantâs address and 101 telephone number provides specific location and contact 102 information for the participant. Therefore, access to the 103 participantâs name, address, and telephone number defeats the 104 sole purpose of the Address Confidentiality Program for Victims 105 of Domestic and Dating Violence, which is to provide safety and 106 security to every participant. 107 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 108 SB 296 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 109 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 110 thereof and becomes a law.